it: Tipo di coulisse del trombone tenore: A flusso assiale (valvola); Coulisse con trigger; Coulisse standard; Altro
th: ทรอมโบนเทเนอร์แบบสไลด์: แกนหมุน (วาล์ว); ไกสไลด์; สไลด์มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ suwaka puzonu tenorowego: Wentyl osiowy (Axial Flow); Spust suwaka; Standardowy suwak; Inny
zh-CN: 次中音长号滑管类型: 轴向流动（拉管）; 滑管触发器; 标准滑管; 其他
da: Trækstype for tenortrombone: Axial flow (ventil); Træk-trigger; Standard træk; Andet
fi: Tenoripasuunan vetoputken tyyppi: Aksiaalivirtaus (venttiili); Liukuliipaisin; Vakioliuku; Muu
sk-SK: Tenorový trombón s posuvníkom: Axiálny (s ventilom); Znížec s ladiacou páčkou; Štandardný znížec; Iné
es: Trombón tenor de tipo deslizante: Flujo axial (válvula); Gatillo de vara; Vara estándar; Otro
ja: テナートロンボーンスライドタイプ: アキシャルフロー (バルブ); スライドトリガー; 標準スライド; その他
vi: Kèn trombone tenor kiểu trượt: Dòng chảy dọc trục (van); Cò trượt; Ống trượt tiêu chuẩn; Khác
sv: Typ av glidmekanism för tenortrombon: Axialflöde (ventil); Dragsystemsventil; Standarddrag; Annat
hr-HR: Vrsta poteznika na tenor trombonu.: Aksijalni protok (ventil); Okidač povlačka; Standardni povlačak; Ostalo
hu: Tenorharsona-csúszka típusa: Axiál szelepes; Húzószelep (trigger); Standard húzó; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип на плъзгача на теноровия тромбон: Аксиален поток (клапа); Плъзгащ се тригер; Стандартен цуг; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta potega (drsnika) tenorske pozavne: Aksialni pretok (ventil); Poteznik; Standardna poteznica; Drugo
ko: 테너 트롬본 슬라이드 유형: 축류식(밸브); 슬라이드 트리거; 표준 슬라이드; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de culisă pentru trombon tenor: Flux axial (supapă); Trăgaci pentru culisă; Culisă standard; Altele
cs: Typ snižce tenorového trombonu: Axiální průtok (ventil); Snižcový trigger; Standardní snížec; Jiné
el: Τύπος σωλήνα τρομπονιού τενόρου: Αξονική ροή (βαλβίδα); Σκανδάλη ολίσθησης; Τυπική ολίσθηση; Άλλο
en: Tenor trombone slide type: Axial flow (valve); Slide trigger; Standard slide; Other
tr: Tenor trombon sürgü tipi: Eksenel akış (valf); Sürgü tetiği; Standart sürgü; Diğer
nl: Tenortrombone schuif type: Axial flow (ventiel); Schuiftrigger; Standaardschuif; Overig
zh-TW: 次中音長號滑管類型: 軸流式 (轉閥); 滑管板機; 標準滑管; 其他
pt-BR: Trombone tenor tipo de vara: Fluxo axial (válvula); Gatilho de vara; Vara padrão; Outro
ru: Тип кулисы тенор-тромбона: Аксиальный поток (вентиль); Кулисный триггер; Стандартная кулиса; Другое
fr: Type de coulisse du trombone ténor: Flux axial (barillet); Gâchette de coulisse; Coulisse standard; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de vara do trombone tenor: Fluxo axial (válvula); Gatilho de vara; Vara padrão; Outro
de: Zugtyp der Tenorposaune: Axialventil; Zug-Trigger; Standard-Zug; Sonstige
lt-LT: Tenorinio trombono slankiklio tipas: Ašinio srauto (vožtuvas); Kulisos paleidiklis; Standartinė kulisa; Kita
nb: Type tenorbasun-slide: Aksialventil; Slide-utløser; Standardslide; Annet